Louisiana, session 2026, HB286.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
13 Section 1. R.S. 33:7728 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 286 Engrossed 2026 Regular Session Berault
Abstract: Repeals certain authority relative to the St. Tammany Mosquito Abatement
District.
Present law provides that the board of commissioners of the St. Tammany Mosquito
Abatement District exercises sole authority for determining the manner in which funds of
the district are expended for purposes of mosquito abatement, control, eradication, and study
subject to the approval of the director of the district.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-437 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 286
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law authorizes the board of commissions of the district to extend any service
authorized by present law outside the territorial boundaries of the district in accordance with
the terms of a service agreement between the board and the governing authority of any
parish or municipality. Further provides for how the service agreement is to be concluded.
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law provides that the board of commissioners may pay the health insurance claims
of district employees when the district's employee health insurance carrier becomes insolvent
and is unable to satisfy those claims. Further provides that the board may use surplus funds
of the district to pay unpaid claims.
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law authorizes the St. Tammany Parish Police Jury to include certain specified areas
within the boundaries of the district.
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law provides that if the St. Tammany Parish Council changes the name of the
district, such redesignation will not affect the respective powers of the board of
commissioners of the district or the parish council.
Proposed law repeals present law.
(Repeals R.S. 33:7728)
Page 2 of 2